Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.48 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. On or before January 1, 2027, the Purchasing Division of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall create and


maintain on its website a State Purchasing Portal. Such portal


shall allow the public to view a record of purchases made by state


agencies, entities, and instrumentalities.


B. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state


agency, entity, or instrumentality shall, within thirty (30) days


after completing any purchase utilizing appropriated state funds,

Req. No. 2975 Page 1


electronically submit a record of such purchase to the Purchasing


Division, including any receipts associated with such purchase.


2. The Purchasing Division shall, within thirty (30) days after


receiving such submission from a state agency, entity, or


instrumentality, publish the record of the purchase, including any


receipts associated with such purchase, on the State Purchasing


Portal.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2975 MSBB 1/14/2026 10:24:43 AM





























Req. No. 2975 Page 2